Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers

7-82-301. District as municipality — Powers — Failure to act — Name change.

From and after the date of the making and filing of an order of incorporation, the district so incorporated shall be a “municipality” or public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name, and the district shall in that name be a body politic and corporate with power of perpetual succession, but without any power to levy or collect taxes. Charges for services authorized in this chapter shall not be construed as taxes. The powers of each district shall be vested in and exercised by a majority of the members of the board of commissioners of the district.

So long as the district continues to furnish any of the services that it is authorized to furnish in this chapter, it shall be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish such services in the district, and no other person, firm or corporation shall furnish or attempt to furnish any of the services in the area embraced by the district, unless and until it has been established that the public convenience and necessity requires other or additional services; provided, that this chapter shall not amend or alter §§ 6-51-101 — 6-51-111, and 6-51-301.

The district shall not be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish systems for gathering, storing or transmitting natural gas by pipeline. Other persons, firms and corporations may furnish such services involving natural gas in the area embraced by the district in addition to such services that are provided by the district.

No person, firm or corporation shall commence construction or operation of any natural gas pipeline until such pipeline shall have met the safety requirements set by the Tennessee public utility commission. In addition, notice by registered mail shall be given to any utility district or municipality in the area or the Tennessee public utility commission, and any affected utility district or municipality shall be permitted to present its interest, if any, to the Tennessee public utility commission, which shall have the authority to review and approve rates and contracts for such services involving natural gas on the record without a public hearing.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this section, a utility district shall retain the exclusive authority to engage in the retail distribution of natural gas within its area.

In addition, no such person, firm, or corporation may transport natural gas from a well that on January 1, 1981, was supplying a utility district or municipality, so long as the utility district or municipality shall offer and pay to the gas producer or gatherer a price, and meet other contractual terms, equal to the price and terms offered to the producer or gatherer by any other bona fide purchaser.

In the event no affirmative action is taken by a newly-formed utility district within one (1) year of the date of filing of order of creation, the county mayor may hold a hearing, after notification of the duly appointed commissioners, and determine if the utility district is proceeding with dispatch and diligence to provide the utility service or services it was authorized to provide in its order of creation. If the county mayor finds that the utility district is not proceeding with dispatch and diligence to provide the utility service or services it was authorized to provide in its order of creation, then the county mayor shall enter an order dissolving the utility district. The president of the utility district shall file with the secretary of state, the utility management review board and the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the district is located, a true and correct copy of the order dissolving the utility district.

In the event a utility district fails to render any of the services for which it was created within a period of four (4) years of the date of filing of order of creation and fails to acquire within such period any assets or facilities necessary to provide the utility service or services for which it was created, the utility district shall be dissolved by operation of law. The county mayor of the county in which the original petition for creation of the utility district was filed shall file a notice of dissolution with the secretary of state and upon such filing the utility district shall no longer be deemed to exist. The county mayor shall file with the utility management review board and the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the utility district is located, a true and correct copy of the notice of dissolution.

After one (1) year from the date of the filing of the order of incorporation of any utility, the name of the utility may be changed by the commissioners filing a petition with the county mayor of the county in which such order of incorporation was filed, setting forth the present name of the utility, the name to which the commissioners want to change and the reasons for such change. Upon good cause being shown, the county mayor shall issue such order, which shall be filed with the county clerk and entered on record.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.28; Acts 1959, ch. 224, § 1; 1959, ch. 327, § 1; 1963, ch. 160, § 1; 1963, ch. 305, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2607; Acts 1981, ch. 468, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 84; 1996, ch. 1065, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 472, § 2; 2011, ch. 215, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” throughout (a)(2)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Exemption of certain utility districts from rural electric and community services cooperative provisions, §65-25-129.

Inapplicability to metropolitan public service districts, §7-3-302.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, §§ 4, 5.

Law Reviews.

Public Sector Labor Relations Law in Tennessee — The Current Inadequacies and the Available Alternatives (Robert B. Moberly), II. The Need for Public Sector Labor Relations Legislation in Tennessee, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 241 (1975).

Attorney General Opinions. Multi-county gas utility districts, OAG 93-56, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (9/2/93).

A city that wishes to provide services within the service area of a utility district may petition the county executive [now county mayor] under T.C.A. §7-82-301(a) to change the service area of the utility district or to allow it to furnish services within the service area of the utility district; the petitioner must establish that “the public convenience and necessity requires” the change sought, OAG 02-110, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (10/07/02).

Utility district operating at a loss. OAG 11-35, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (4/15/11).

“Growth and Development Fees” and “Impact Fees” levied by local utilities. OAG 12-11, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/3/12).

7-82-302. Power to operate utilities.

Any district heretofore or hereafter created under authority of this chapter is empowered to conduct, operate and maintain a system or systems for the furnishing of water, sewer, sewage disposal, natural gas, natural gas storage and related facilities, liquefied natural gas storage and related facilities, liquid propane gas storage and related facilities and other gaseous storage and related facilities, artificial gas, police, fire protection, garbage collection and garbage disposal, street lighting, parks and recreational facilities, transit facilities, transmission of industrial chemicals by pipeline to or from industries or plants located within the boundary of the district, transmission of natural gas by pipeline from one (1) or more wells or other sources of natural gas, or from one (1) or more collection points of natural gas located within or without the district, but in no event more than five (5) miles beyond the boundary of the district to one (1) or more utilities, “utilities” to include natural gas transportation pipelines, industries, or plants located within or without the district, but in no event more than one hundred (100) miles beyond the boundary of the district, community antenna television service, except for community antenna television service in counties having a population of more than sixty thousand (60,000) but less than sixty thousand one hundred (60,100), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or two (2) or more of such systems, and to carry out such purpose it shall have the power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, consolidate, maintain and operate such system or systems, within or without the district, and to purchase from, and furnish, deliver and sell to any municipality, the state, any public institution and the public, generally, any of the services authorized by this chapter.

Powers relating to garbage disposal shall include the power of one (1) or more utility districts, acting individually or jointly, to engage in the conversion of garbage into steam power. In connection with the construction, financing, operation or maintenance of a facility for converting garbage into steam power, a utility district shall have the same power and authority as a municipality has under § 7-54-103(d) in connection with energy production facilities, and shall comply with the requirements set out in § 7-54-110, it being the intent of the general assembly to further the energy and environmental objectives of Acts 1983, chapter 226 and title 68, chapter 211.

Powers relating to natural gas shall include the power to own and operate natural gas vehicle fueling stations; provided, that no utility district is authorized to franchise the operation of any such natural gas vehicle fueling station to another entity; provided, further, that subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall not prohibit nor in any way be construed to prohibit any other person, firm or corporation from owning and operating a natural gas vehicle fueling station within the area embraced by the district.

Powers relating to natural gas include the power to sell any appliance or heating system, or set of appliances, that have a natural gas or propane gas component, and to facilitate those sales by installment payment plans and financing to customers. Incentives plans that include financing to home builders and contractors are also authorized. Transactions with customers may provide for periodic payments for appliances and heating to be added to customer monthly service billing statements. Natural gas providers may terminate utility service upon non-payment of these transactions in accordance with policies adopted by the utility's governing board.

Powers relating to natural gas include the power, together with all powers incidental to that power or necessary for the performance of that power, acting by resolution of its governing body to purchase natural gas by contract or other agreement from a public corporation that is created under the authority of a contiguous state and that is similar to an energy acquisition corporation, as defined in § 7-39-102. A utility district has the power to enter into a contract or arrangement, including contracts to take or pay for any gas or gas substitutes, with such a public corporation created under the authority of a contiguous state. The contract or arrangement must contain the terms, covenants, representations, warranties, provisions, and duration as the governing body of the utility district determines.

Powers relating to water, sewer, and natural gas services include the power for utility districts to enter into agreements with companies to provide water, sewer, or natural gas leak protection bill coverage, insurance, or service agreements for customers and to offer their customers water line, sewer line, or natural gas line damage protection coverage, insurance, or service agreements for customer-owned water, sewer, or natural gas lines. Utility districts may include the costs for the coverage, insurance, or service agreements on the monthly utility bills of their customers. As used in this subdivision (6), “utility districts” includes any utility district created pursuant to this chapter or any public or private act and any water or sewer authority created by any public or private act.

With respect to the conduct and operation of a police protection system, nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as meaning or intending any encroachment upon the police powers of the sheriff of any county in this state, but shall only empower the district to conduct and operate such police protection system when it is enabled to do so through legal arrangements with the sheriff of the county, and other constituted authorities, in a manner consistent with all provisions of the Constitution of Tennessee. The inclusion of the power of conducting and operating a police protection system as one of the purposes for which a district may be created shall not in anywise affect the validity of this section, the general assembly hereby expressly declaring its purpose to enact the remainder of this section without the provision contained in this section authorizing the conduct and operation of a police protection system, if the inclusion of such provision should be held to be invalid.

“Transit facilities” means all real and personal property needed to provide public passenger transportation by means of trolley coach, bus, motor coach, or any combination of trolley coach, bus, and motorcoach, including terminal, maintenance and storage facilities.

Community antenna television service shall be limited to all practices permitted by rules and regulations promulgated from time to time by the federal communications commission. This provision shall not apply to counties having populations over six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Such community antenna television service shall include the right to acquire and hold such real and personal property as may be needed to accomplish this subsection (d).

Districts created on or after July 1, 1967, shall be empowered to furnish only those services stated in the order creating the district. Districts incorporated before July 1, 1967, shall be authorized to furnish only the services being furnished on that date, or that shall be furnished by facilities to be constructed from the proceeds of bonds issued not later than July 1, 1968. Supplemental petitions for authority to furnish other services contained in this section may be addressed to the county mayor, who shall give notice and hold hearings on such petitions in the same manner, on the same issues, and under the same conditions as for original incorporation.

A supplemental petition shall be filed with the utility management review board simultaneously with the filing of the petition with the county mayor or county mayors but is not subject to approval or disapproval by the utility management review board as set forth in §§ 7-82-201(a) and 7-82-202(a). In the order granting a supplemental petition, the county mayor or mayors may exclude territory within the district's boundaries that is already receiving the service sought to be furnished by the district from the grant of authority to the district to provide such service under this subsection (e).

A system or facilities for “the transmission of industrial chemicals by pipeline,” as used in this section, means and includes facilities or a system used or useful in the transmission by pipeline of industrial chemicals and related commodities, in liquid, gaseous, or solid form, including raw materials, processed products, or by-products, to or from plants or industries located within the boundary of the district, on an individual basis, or in company with other plants, and to or from docks, terminals or tank farms located within or without the boundary of the district, but within the same county. Such system or facilities include, but are not limited to, the pipelines, docks, terminals, tank farms, compressor stations, storage and temperature treatment facilities, rights-of-way, and together with all real and personal property and equipment appurtenant to, or useful in connection with, such facilities.

Before any district shall be authorized to conduct, operate or maintain such system or facilities for transmission of industrial chemicals by pipeline, as provided in this section, the board of commissioners of the district, whether previously installed in such office or nominated only, shall submit a petition signed in their own names to the county mayor in which the order approving the creation of the district was or shall be entered, whereupon the county mayor shall, upon notice published, as provided by § 7-82-202, and public hearing, determine whether or not the project so proposed shall promote industry and develop trade to provide against low employment, and enter an order so finding.

On the issue of whether or not industry, trade and employment shall be so promoted and developed, the county mayor shall take into consideration the plants proposed to be served by the facilities for transmission of industrial chemicals by pipeline, but no project so proposed to be undertaken shall be found not to promote and develop industry, trade and employment for either of the following reasons:

That the project shall provide service for a single plant; or

That the project shall serve to maintain existing industry and employment rather than encourage new industry and additional employment.

Any party in interest, including any subscriber to existing services of the district, shall have the right of appeal from the order as provided by § 7-82-204, but no consent to the undertaking of such district services by any number of existing subscribers shall be required, notwithstanding § 7-82-303.

Incorporated cities and towns having a population of five thousand (5,000) or more shall have the prior right as respects utility districts to extend water, sewer or other utilities in any territory within five (5) miles of their corporate limits; where an incorporated city or town has a population of less than five thousand (5,000), the limit shall be three (3) miles; provided, that this provision shall not apply within the boundaries of a utility district or to facilities heretofore extended by a utility district beyond its boundaries; and provided, further, that a utility district may extend water, sewer or other utility facilities into such an area through agreement with the city or town concerned. A city or town shall lose its prior right under the following conditions:

Where an agreement cannot be reached, the utility district, by a resolution setting out the area to be served and the type of utility, shall notify the city or town of its intention to serve the area;

After receipt of such notice, the city or town shall have sixty (60) days in which to adopt an appropriate ordinance or resolution determining to serve the area within a specified time. The utility district may, within ten (10) days, appeal to the county mayor of the county in which the major part of the land area is located if it considers the time so determined is too long, whereupon the county mayor after hearing both parties, shall determine a reasonable time for the city or town to provide the services, and further appeal may be taken by either party as provided in § 7-82-204; and

Upon failure of the city or town to provide the services within the time so determined, the utility district shall be authorized to serve any part of the area not already served by the city or town.

A system or facilities for “the transmission of natural gas by pipeline,” as used in this section, means and includes facilities or a system used or useful in the transmission by pipeline of natural gas from one (1) or more wells or other sources of natural gas or from one (1) or more collection points of natural gas located within or without the district, but in no event more than five (5) miles beyond the boundary of the district, to one (1) or more utilities, plants or industries located within or without the district, but in no event more than one hundred (100) miles distant from the boundary of the district; provided, that a portion of the system or facilities shall be located within the boundary of the district. Such system or facilities shall include, but not be limited to, pipelines, collection facilities, terminal facilities, rights-of-way and all real and personal property, including machinery and equipment, appurtenant to, or useful in connection with, such system or facilities.

No district shall be authorized to conduct, operate or maintain such system or facilities for transmission of natural gas by pipeline, as provided in this section, unless the board of commissioners of the district, whether previously installed in such office or nominated only, shall submit a petition signed in their own names to the county mayor in which the order approving the creation of the district was or shall be entered, and the county mayor shall, upon notice published as provided by § 7-82-202 and public hearing, determine either that the project so proposed shall promote commerce, preserve the natural resources, or aid in the prevention of environmental pollution, and enter an order so finding.

On the issue of whether or not such purpose or purposes shall be so promoted, preserved or aided, the county mayor shall take into consideration the utilities, plants or industries proposed to be served by the facilities for transmission of natural gas by pipeline, but no project so proposed to be undertaken shall be found not to promote commerce, preserve the natural resources, or aid in the prevention of environmental pollution for the reason that the project shall provide service for a single utility, plant or industry.

Any party in interest, including any subscriber to existing services of the district, shall have the right of appeal from the order as provided by § 7-82-204, but no consent to the undertaking of such district services by any number of existing subscribers shall be required, notwithstanding § 7-82-303.

Section 7-82-501, authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending any facility or system authorized by this chapter, is hereby made applicable to any district undertaking to exercise the power conferred by this section to conduct, operate and maintain a system or facilities for the transmission of industrial chemicals or natural gas by pipeline.

Any district providing propane gas service on April 15, 1998, is empowered to provide such service within the county or counties in which it is providing service on that date without any further proceedings before or approvals of any county mayor, the utility management review board or any other person or agency; provided, that the authorization contained in this subsection (j) shall not preclude any other person, firm or corporation, public or private, from furnishing propane gas service within the area served by the district. Any such utility district is further empowered to sell or dispose of its propane gas service operation, in whole or in part.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 5; 1947, ch. 76, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.30; Acts 1951, ch. 262, § 2; 1957, ch. 128, § 1; 1959, ch. 166, § 2; 1961, ch. 216, § 1; 1963, ch. 98, § 1; 1963, ch. 372, § 1; 1965, ch. 87, §§ 2-4; 1965, ch. 182, § 1; 1968, ch. 529, § 3; 1974, ch. 722, §§ 1-3; 1977, ch. 214, § 1; 1978, ch. 892, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2608; Acts 1984, ch. 796, § 2; 1998, ch. 977, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 485, § 1; 2009, ch. 316, § 1; 2009, ch. 472, § 1; 2017, ch. 129, § 8; 2018, ch. 746, § 1; 2019, ch. 228, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1983, ch. 226, see Disposition of Acts Table in Volume 13.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (a)(4).

The 2018 amendment added (a)(5).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 746, § 2. April 18, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 228, § 4. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Extension of service outside district, §7-51-401.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Political Subdivisions Versus Employers: Does Jurisdiction of NLRB Extend to Public Utility Districts? (Robert Schneider), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 347 (1971).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of private act creating water and wastewater authority, OAG 97-103, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 100 (7/28/97).

A utility district is authorized to extend water mains and sewer lines using its own funds in order to increase customer load and promote development in its service area, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

It is within a district's authority to change its policy to allow extension of water mains and sewer lines using its own funds without requiring a developer or customer requesting the service to pay the full cost of the extensions, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

A utility district is authorized to adopt and enforce a written extension policy that allows it to expend a portion of its own funds on each requested extension of water mains and sewer lines based on reasonable economic factors, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

A utility district is authorized to adopt and enforce a written extension policy that provides a two-tier approach whereby developers of subdivisions and other service requesters who require less than a minimum number of taps are required to pay for the entire cost of the extension, while other, larger extension requests that involve more than the minimum number of taps are paid in part by the developer and in part by the district based on reasonable economic factors, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

A utility district is authorized to expend its own funds to extend utility lines and mains to a newly established industrial park in anticipation of future development activity related to such extension, even if the project is speculative with no actual customers requesting service at the time of the extension, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

A utility district is authorized to contribute funds to its local chamber of commerce, its county government, or its county's nonprofit economic development corporation for economic development activities aimed at increasing development in the district's service area in anticipation of increasing its customer base and service loads, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

Several utility districts may establish a not for profit corporation as part of an interlocal cooperative agreement for a joint exercise of their powers; whether a district is authorized to support the activities in which the corporation will engage depends on whether its support is necessary or requisite to its authority to own, operate, develop, and maintain a utility district, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

Whether a utility district may voluntarily pay a higher rate of dues than regular members for membership in a jointly formed organization to promote economic development activities depends on specific facts and circumstances, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

Whether a utility district is authorized to incur expenses, and to pay such expenses from its funds, directly related to its recruitment of new industry or commercial development prospects that might increase the service load on the district's system and thereby strengthen the economic operation of the system depends on specific facts and circumstances, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

7-82-303. Subscribers' consent to new services.

No utility district created prior to March 4, 1947, under the terms and provisions of this chapter, shall undertake to render or obligate itself to render services other than those for the furnishing of water, sewer, sewage disposal, fire protection, natural gas or artificial gas, unless and until it shall first have obtained the consent in writing of subscribers representing seventy-five percent (75%) in number of the total subscribers to the existing services furnished by the utility district at the time such written consents are obtained. The determination by the board of commissioners of any such district as to the percentage represented by the written consent of such subscribers shall be conclusive, that no such district may furnish natural gas service to any area now actually served by a private company.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 5; 1947, ch. 76, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.31 (Williams, § 3695.30); Acts 1951, ch. 262, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2609.